Utah statutes.
58-70a-502.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  engaging in practice as a licensed physician assistant while not under the supervision of a supervising physician or substitute supervising physician; or

(2)  violating the drug dispensing requirements of Section 58-17b-309 or 58-17b-309.5, if applicable.

